Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3578
Hospital districts; merger; property, debts, liabilities; transferred; exception.

After the entry by the county board of its order for merger of the districts, all property, debts, and liabilities of the former hospital districts shall be transferred to the new district, except that all outstanding bonded indebtedness of the previously existing hospital districts shall be allocated to the real estate included within such prior existing districts as provided in the plan of merger.

Laws 1978, LB 560, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.128.